src/srseng/resources/fst/srs2eng.lexc
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  w i l l %  l i f t %  %/ p i c k %/ h o l d %  i t %  u p %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā n á y ī d ī ʔ ò "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  w i l l %  l i f t %/ p i c k %/ h o l d %  i t %  u p %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā n á y ī d ī ʔ ò "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  w i l l %  l i f t %/ p i c k %/ h o l d %  i t %  u p %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā n á y ī d ī ʔ ò "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à n á y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à n á y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à n á y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à n á y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à n á y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à n á y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  %( A S S E R T I V E %) %  l o s e %  i t %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ à n à n á y ī d ī ʔ ò %- h ī %  á t ' à "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  l i f t e d %/ p i c k e d %  i t %  u p %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī ʔ ó n "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  l i f t e d %/ p i c k e d %  i t %  u p %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī ʔ ó n "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  l i f t e d %/ p i c k e d %  i t %  u p %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī ʔ ó n "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  l i f t e d %/ p i c k e d %  i t %  u p %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī ʔ ó n "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  l i f t e d %/ p i c k e d %  i t %  u p %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī ʔ ó n "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  l i f t e d %/ p i c k e d %  i t %  u p %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī ʔ ó n "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  l i f t e d %/ p i c k e d %  i t %  u p %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī ʔ ó n "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  l i f t %/ p i c k %  i t %  u p %  l a t e r %  o n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī y ī ʔ ò ł ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  l i f t %/ p i c k %  i t %  u p %  l a t e r %  o n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī y ī ʔ ò ł ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  l i f t %/ p i c k %  i t %  u p %  l a t e r %  o n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī y ī ʔ ò ł ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  l i f t %/ p i c k %  i t %  u p %  l a t e r %  o n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī y ī ʔ ò ł ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  l i f t %/ p i c k %  i t %  u p %  l a t e r %  o n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī y ī ʔ ò ł ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  l i f t %/ p i c k %  i t %  u p %  l a t e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī y ī ʔ ò ł ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  l i f t %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ t ā y ī d ī y ī ʔ ò ł ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  h a n d %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī ʔ ò "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī d ī ʔ ò "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī d ī ʔ ò "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī d ī ʔ ò "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī d ī ʔ ò "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī d ī ʔ ò "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī d ī ʔ ò "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī d ī ʔ ò "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  a g a i n %  %( r o u n d %) ] : [ k ú n á y ī d ī s ʔ ò n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
